Maryland, session 2026, SB0010.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Transportation
21–809.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(5) “Program administrator” means an employee or a representative of the
local jurisdiction, the State Highway Administration, or the Maryland Transportation
Authority designated by the local jurisdiction, the State Highway Administration, or the
Authority to oversee a contract with a speed monitoring system contractor.
(9) “Speed monitoring system” means a device with one or more motor
vehicle sensors producing recorded images of motor vehicles traveling at speeds at least 12
miles per hour above the posted speed limit.
– 1 –

Ch. 534 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(b) (1) (ii) 1. Before a county may use a speed monitoring system on a
State highway at a location within a municipal corporation, the county shall:
[1.] A. Obtain the approval of the State Highway
Administration;
[2.] B. Notify the municipal corporation of the State
Highway Administration’s approval of the use of a speed monitoring system at that
location; and
[3.] C. Grant the municipal corporation 60 days from the
date of the county’s notice to the municipal corporation to enact an ordinance authorizing
the municipal corporation instead of the county to use a speed monitoring system at that
location.
2. A. WITHIN 90 120 DAYS AFTER RECEIPT OF AN
APPLICATION SUBMITTED BY A PROGRAM ADMINISTRATOR OR THE PROGRAM
ADMINISTRATOR’S CONTRACTOR FOR THE USE OF A SPEED MONITORING SYSTEM
UNDER THIS SUBPARAGRAPH, THE STATE HIGHWAY ADMINISTRATION SHALL
APPROVE OR DENY THE APPLICATION OR RETURN THE APPLICATION AS
INCOMPLETE.
B. IF THE ADMINISTRATION DOES NOT APPROVE, DENY,
OR RETURN AN APPLICATION IN ACCORDANCE WITH SUBSUBSUBPARAGRAPH A OF
THIS SUBSUBPARAGRAPH, THE APPLICATION SHALL BE DEEMED APPROVED.
C. A SPEED MONITORING SYSTEM CONTRACTOR THAT
SUBMITS AN APPLICATION UNDER THIS SUBPARAGRAPH SHALL CONSULT WITH THE
PROGRAM ADMINISTRATOR BEFORE AND AFTER THE SUBMISSION OF THE
APPLICATION.
D. A PROGRAM ADMINISTRATOR OR THE PROGRAM
ADMINISTRATOR’S CONTRACTOR MAY NOT SUBMIT MORE THAN 10 APPLICATIONS
FOR THE USE OF A SPEED MONITORING SYSTEM UNDER THIS SUBPARAGRAPH
DURING ANY 30–DAY PERIOD.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.
Approved by the Governor, May 12, 2026.
– 2 –